Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-1705
Security interest; enforcement by assignee.

An assignee may enforce a security interest in rents by (1) the appointment of a receiver under applicable law, (2) the recovery of rents as part of the enforcement of an assignment instrument, or (3) as provided in section 52-1706 or under other applicable law. The collection of rents by an assignee in accordance with section 52-1706 shall not be deemed to impose the obligations of a mortgagee or any other person in possession of the real estate on the assignee.

Laws 1993, LB 14, § 5.